test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuejjeei_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tuejjeei e-stem: # Noun 'maker/tekijä' - full paradigm
     tuejjeei+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: tuejjeei
     tuejjeei+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: tuejjeei
     tuejjeei+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: tuejjeei
     tuejjeei+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: tuejjeeja
     tuejjeei+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: tuejjeejest
     tuejjeei+N+Sg+Com+Indef: tuejjeejain
     tuejjeei+N+Ess+Indef: tuejjeejen
     tuejjeei+N+Par+Indef: tuejjeejed
     tuejjeei+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [tuejjeeitaa, tuejjeeitää]
     tuejjeei+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: tuejjeei
     tuejjeei+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: tuejjeejai
     tuejjeei+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: tuejjeejaid
     tuejjeei+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: tuejjeejaid
     tuejjeei+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: tuejjeejain
     tuejjeei+N+Pl+Com+Indef: tuejjeejaivuiʹm
     tuejjeei+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [tuejjeejaitaa, tuejjeejaitää]
